Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 19 Sentence and Execution
12-19-30.
Certification and default on recognizances.

Every recognizance pursuant to §

12-19-29

shall be immediately certified to the clerk of the superior court for the same county and filed by the clerk in his or her office; and in case any person under a recognizance shall fail to perform its conditions, his or her default shall be recorded and process shall issue against the persons bound in the recognizance, or any of them that the attorney general shall direct.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 177; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-30

.

12-19-31.
Commitment for nonpayment of fines and costs.

Whenever any person shall be committed for nonpayment of fines and costs, the sheriffs of the several counties and their deputies, and the town sergeants and town constables of any town in the several counties, upon due warrant from the court before whom the person has been convicted, may lawfully remove and commit the persons to the adult correctional institutions and they shall be allowed any fees that are now provided by law in similar cases; provided, that in the counties of Newport and Washington, any person before removal from the county of Newport or the county of Washington, in which sentence is entered, may pay the fine and costs into the court or into the office of the clerk of the court in which sentence is imposed and upon payment shall be discharged.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 41; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 41; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; P.L. 1920, ch. 1938, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 41; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 41; P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-31

; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 24; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 24.

12-19-32.
Restitution.

In addition to or in lieu of any non-mandatory sanction imposed as part of a sentence or as a condition of probation, a judge at the time of sentencing may order restitution which may be in the form of monetary payment or some type of community restitution. Provided, that any person sentenced to a period of incarceration at the adult correctional institutions shall be ineligible to participate in those programs established pursuant to chapter 8 of title 13, §

42-56-20.2

,

42-56-20.3

or

42-56-21

, unless and until the restitution has been paid in full, or satisfactory arrangements have been made with the court if the person has the ability to pay. Any agreement shall be in writing and it shall be the burden of the person seeking to participate in any of the programs to satisfy the appropriate authority of compliance. Any person subject to the provisions of this chapter may request an ability to pay hearing by filing the request with the court which imposed the original sentence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 94, § 1.

12-19-32.1.
Mandatory restitution.

Any person who sells, causes to be sold, or otherwise delivers or causes to be delivered any stolen article or metal to a person licensed pursuant to chapter 11.1 of title 6 shall make full monetary restitution to the person so licensed. For purposes of this section, the amount of monetary restitution shall equal the monetary value of the loss actually sustained by the licensed person. A licensed person who knowingly receives stolen goods shall not be entitled to restitution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 473, § 1.

12-19-33.
Restitution — Family court.

In addition to the powers already vested in the family court, a justice may order restitution which may be in the form of monetary payment or some type of community restitution.

The parent or parents of any unemancipated minor or minors, which minor or minors willfully or maliciously cause damage to any property or injury to any person, shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor or minors for the damage or injury to an amount not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000) if the minor or minors would have been liable for the damage or injury if they had been adults; and if a justice of the family court so finds, he or she may order the parent or parents to make financial restitution not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 550, § 1.

12-19-34.
Priority of restitution payments to victims of crime.

If a person, pursuant to §§

12-19-32

,

12-19-32

.1, or

12-19-33

, is ordered to make restitution in the form of monetary payment the court may order that it shall be made through the administrative office of state courts which shall record all payments and pay the money to the person injured in accordance with the order or with any modification of the order; provided, in cases where the court determines that the defendant has the present ability to make full restitution, payment shall be made at the time of sentencing.

Payments made on account when both restitution to a third-party is ordered, and court costs, fines, and fees, and assessments related to prosecution are owed, shall be disbursed by the administrative office of the state courts in the following priorities:

Upon determination of restitution, court ordered restitution payments shall be paid first to persons injured until such time as the court’s restitution is fully satisfied;

Followed by the payment of court costs, fines, fees, and assessments related to prosecution.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any interest which has been accrued by the restitution account in the central registry shall be deposited on a regular basis into the crime victim compensation fund, established by chapter 25 of this title. In the event that the office of the administrator of the state courts cannot locate the person or persons to whom restitution is to be made, the principal of the restitution payment shall escheat to the state pursuant to the provisions of chapter 12 of title 8.

The state is authorized to develop rules and/or regulations relating to assessment, collection, and disbursement of restitution payments when any of the following events occur:

The defendant is incarcerated or on home confinement or has completed probation without completing restitution but is able to pay some portion of the restitution; or

The victim dies before restitution payments are completed.

The state may maintain a civil action to place a lien on the personal or real property of a defendant who is assessed restitution, as well as to seek wage garnishment, and/or seek enforcement of civil judgment entered in accordance with §

12-28-5.1

consistent with state and federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 25, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 297, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 326, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 231, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 351, § 1.

12-19-35.
Evidence of damages sustained.

Evidence of damages sustained by the person injured may be admissible to the court either by means of an affidavit, signed by the injured person, with copies of appropriate receipts attached, or by hearing, the option being within the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 234, § 1.

12-19-36.
Payment to violent crimes indemnity fund.

Whenever any person pleads nolo contendere to either a felony or misdemeanor, the court accepting the plea may, in lieu of imposing the fine authorized by statute for the offense, order the person to pay an amount not to exceed the maximum fine permitted by statute to the violent crimes indemnity fund established by chapter 25 of this title. The obligation to make a payment to the fund shall be considered a civil penalty and shall not constitute a sentence in the criminal case.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 258, § 2.

12-19-37.
Aliens — Felony conviction records.

The attorney general shall, within seven (7) days of the final conviction of any alien of a felony offense within this state, forward copies of all records pertaining to the convicted alien to the United States immigration department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 203, § 1.

12-19-38.
Hate Crimes Sentencing Act.

If any person has been convicted of a crime charged by complaint, information, or indictment in which he or she intentionally selected the person against whom the offense is committed or selected the property that is damaged or otherwise affected by the offense because of the actor’s hatred or animus toward the actual or perceived disability, religion, color, race, national origin or ancestry, sexual orientation, or gender of that person or the owner or occupant of that property, he or she shall be subject to the penalties provided in this section.

Whenever it appears that a person may be subject to the Hate Crime Sentencing Act, the prosecuting agency, in no case later than the pretrial conference, shall file with the court a notice specifying that the defendant, upon conviction, is subject to the imposition of sentencing in accordance with this section.

For misdemeanor offenses, upon any plea of guilty or nolo contendere or verdict or finding of guilty of the defendant, the district court shall conduct a sentencing hearing. At the hearing, the court shall permit the prosecuting agency and the defense to present additional evidence relevant to the determination of whether the defendant intentionally selected the person against whom the offense is committed, or selected the property that is damaged, or otherwise affected by the offense because of his or her hatred or animus toward the actual or perceived race, religion, color, disability, national origin or ethnicity, gender, or sexual orientation of that person or the owner or occupant of that property. If the finder of fact at the hearing, or in the case of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, the district court at sentencing, determines beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant’s actions were so motivated, he or she shall be sentenced to not less than thirty (30) days mandatory imprisonment, nor more than one year imprisonment for that crime: and for this penalty, he or she shall not be afforded the provisions of filing, suspension of sentence, or probation.

For felony offenses and for misdemeanor offenses in which the defendant claims a jury trial either in the first instance or by appeal, upon any plea of guilt or nolo contendere or verdict or finding of guilt of the defendant, the court shall conduct a sentencing hearing. At the hearing, the court shall permit the prosecuting agency and the defense to present additional evidence to the jury relevant to the determination of whether the defendant intentionally selected the person against whom the offense is committed, or selected the property that is damaged, or otherwise affected by the offense because of his or her hatred or animus toward the actual or perceived race, religion, color, disability, national origin or ethnicity, gender, or sexual orientation of that person or the owner or occupant of that property. If the jury at the hearing, or in the case of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, the court at sentencing, determines beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant’s actions were so motivated, he or she shall be sentenced for a misdemeanor in accordance with subsection (c) of this section and for a felony by the court to an additional, consecutive term of imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five (5) years, but in no case, more than double the original penalty for the crime.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 83, § 1.

12-19-39.
Criminal street gang enhancement.

“Criminal street gang” means an ongoing organization, association, or group of three (3) or more persons, whether formal or informal, having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal or delinquent acts; having an identifiable name or common identifiable signs, colors, or symbols; and whose members individually or collectively engage in, or have engaged in, a pattern of criminal gang activity.

Any person who is convicted of any felony that is knowingly committed for the benefit, at the direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang or criminal street gang member, with the intent to promote, further, or assist in the affairs of a criminal street gang or criminal conduct by criminal street gang members, in addition to the sentence provided for the commission of the underlying offense, shall be subject to imprisonment for an additional term of not more than ten (10) years.

Whenever it appears that a person may be subject to the enhanced sentence in this section, the attorney general, in no case later than the first pretrial conference, shall file with the court a notice specifying that the defendant, upon conviction, is subject to the imposition of sentencing in accordance with this section.

Upon any plea of guilt or nolo contendere, or verdict or finding of guilt of the defendant, the court shall conduct a sentencing hearing. At the hearing, the court shall permit the attorney general and the defense to present additional evidence to the jury relevant to the determination of whether the defendant knowingly committed the offense for the benefit, at the direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang or criminal street gang member, with the intent to promote, further, or assist in the affairs of a criminal street gang or criminal conduct by criminal street gang members. If the jury at the hearing, or in the case of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, the court at sentencing, determines beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant’s actions were so motivated, he or she shall be sentenced as provided in subsection (b).

This section does not create a separate offense but provides an additional enhanced sentence for the underlying offense.

The enhanced sentence provided in this section shall run consecutively to the sentences provided for the underlying offenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 311, § 1.

12-19-40.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 345, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 351, § 2.